sk-SK: Pokrytie struny: 2 struny; 3 struny; 4 struny; 5 struny; 6 strún (kompletné); Iné
ja: ストリング範囲: 2弦; 3弦; 4弦; 5弦; 6弦 (フル); その他
th: การครอบคลุมสาย: 2 สาย; 3 สาย; 4 สาย; 5 สาย; 6 สาย (เต็ม); อื่นๆ
el: Κάλυψη χορδών: 2 χορδές; 3 χορδές; 4 χορδές; 5 χορδές; 6 χορδές (πλήρες); Άλλο
zh-CN: 琴弦覆盖范围: 2 根弦; 3 根弦; 4 根弦; 5 根弦; 6 根弦（全）; 其他
pt-PT: Cobertura de cordas: 2 cordas; 3 cordas; 4 cordas; 5 cordas; 6 cordas (completo); Outro
nb: Strengdekning: 2 strenger; 3 strenger; 4 strenger; 5 strenger; 6 strenger (full); Annet
bg-BG: Покритие на струната: 2 струни; 3 струни; 4 струни; 5 струни; 6 струни (пълно); Друго
en: String coverage: 2 strings; 3 strings; 4 strings; 5 strings; 6 strings (full); Other
ko: 현 커버 범위: 2현; 3현; 4현; 5현; 6현(전체); 기타
fr: Cordes concernées: 2 cordes; 3 cordes; 4 cordes; 5 cordes; 6 cordes (complet); Autre
hr-HR: pokrivenost niza: 2 žice; 3 žice; 4 žice; 5 žica; 6 žica (puni komplet); Ostalo
zh-TW: 琴弦覆蓋範圍: 2 弦; 3 弦; 4 弦; 5 弦; 6 弦 (全); 其他
pl: Osłona strun: 2 struny; 3 struny; 4 struny; 5 strun; 6 strun (pełny zestaw); Inny
de: Saitenabdeckung: 2 Saiten; 3 Saiten; 4 Saiten; 5 Saiten; 6 Saiten (vollständig); Andere
sv: sträng täckning: 2 strängar; 3 strängar; 4 strängar; 5 strängar; 6 strängar (hel); Övrigt
sl-SI: Pokritost strun: 2 struni; 3 strune; 4 strune; 5 strun; 6 strun (polno); Drugo
da: Dækkede strenge: 2 strenge; 3 strenge; 4 strenge; 5 strenge; 6 strenge (fuld); Andet
fi: Kohdekielet: 2 kieltä; 3 kieltä; 4 kieltä; 5 kieltä; 6 kieltä (täysi); Muu
it: Copertura delle corde: 2 corde; 3 corde; 4 corde; 5 corde; 6 corde (set completo); Altro
pt-BR: Corda cobertura: 2 cordas; 3 cordas; 4 cordas; 5 cordas; 6 cordas (completo); Outro
hu: Húrozás kiterjedése: 2 húr; 3 húr; 4 húr; 5 húr; 6 húr (teljes); Egyéb
cs: Rozsah strun: 2 struny; 3 struny; 4 struny; 5 strun; 6 strun (kompletní); Jiné
lt-LT: Stygų aprėptis: 2 stygos; 3 stygos; 4 stygos; 5 stygos; 6 stygos (pilnas); Kita
vi: Phạm vi phủ sóng chuỗi: 2 dây; 3 dây; 4 dây; 5 dây; 6 dây (đầy đủ); Khác
ro-RO: Acoperirea corzilor: 2 corzi; 3 corzi; 4 corzi; 5 corzi; 6 corzi (set complet); Altele
ru: Охват струн: 2 струны; 3 струны; 4 струны; 5 струн; 6 струн (полный набор); Другое
es: Cobertura de la cuerda: 2 cuerdas; 3 cuerdas; 4 cuerdas; 5 cuerdas; 6 cuerdas (completo); Otro
nl: Snaar dekking: 2 snaren; 3 snaren; 4 snaren; 5 snaren; 6 snaren (volledig); Overig
tr: Tel kapsama alanı: 2 tel; 3 tel; 4 tel; 5 tel; 6 tel (tam); Diğer